Hawaii statutes.
§712-1216 Promoting pornography; prima
facie evidence. (1) The fact that a person engaged in the conduct
specified by section 712-1215 is prima facie evidence that the person engaged
in that conduct with knowledge of the character and content of the material
disseminated or the performance produced, presented, directed, participated in,
exhibited, or to be exhibited.

(2) In a prosecution under section 712-1215,
the fact that the person:

(a) To whom material pornographic for minors was disseminated;

(b) To whom a performance pornographic for minors
was exhibited;

(c) To whom an admission ticket or pass was sold to
premises where there was or was to have been exhibited such performance; or

(d) Who was admitted to premises where there was or
was to have been such performance,

was at that time, a minor, is prima facie evidence
that the defendant knew the person to be a minor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen
ch 1993; am L 2015, c 35, §30]

Revision Note

In subsection (2)(a) and (b), "or" deleted and
punctuation changed and in subsection (2)(c), punctuation changed pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Prima facie evidence, see §701-117.

COMMENTARY ON §712-1216

Section 712-1216(1) provides that engagement in the act of
promoting pornography, generally or for minors, is prima facie evidence that
the actor did so with knowledge of the character and content of the material
disseminated or performance produced, presented, directed, participated in,
exhibited, or to be exhibited. The subsection addresses itself to a special
prosecutorial problem. Since §§712-1214 and 1215 require knowledge on the
promoter's part of the character and content of the pornography which the
promoter promotes, the prosecution is required to prove, beyond a reasonable
doubt, that the defendant knew of the character and content of the pornographic
material or performance. However in such cases there is often little evidence
of the actor's knowledge of such facts. A recent work in this area has
underlined this difficulty quite well:

How does one prove (beyond a
reasonable doubt) what moves in the recesses of another's mind? How does one
show that a bookseller knows the items in his stock, that a theater owner is
familiar with the movies he exhibits, or that a newsdealer is aware of the
general character of the magazines he displays? Aside from those dubious
dialogues in which a dealer says how "hot" is his merchandise--
conversations most unlikely to take place when the purchaser is a
fifteen-year-old--scienter, realistically viewed is rarely susceptible of sure
proof. But common sense may assist. No corner hardware merchant would long
prosper, lacking general familiarity with the items he had for sale...
similarly, honest book and magazine dealers have some general knowledge of the
character of the wares they order, put on their shelves, sometimes display and
ultimately hope to sell. The draft statute would transmute this common
sense into law....[1]

With this reasoning in mind, subsection (1) allows the
prosecution to get its case to the jury on the issue of the actor's knowledge
of character and content of the material, film, or performance on proof of the
specified conduct only.

Much the same evidentiary problem, difficulty in proving mens
rea, is presented when the age of another person is made an element of the
offense, as is the case in §712-1215. Section 712-1216(2) provides the same
prima facie rule with respect to age that subsection (1) provides with respect
to the nature of the material or performance. Again, the evidentiary rule
merely permits the prosecution to get the case to the trier of fact on that
issue: the burden of proof beyond a reasonable doubt remains on the
prosecution. In such situations, the defendant would be free to introduce, but
would not be obligated to do so, any evidence tending to negate the inference
that the defendant knew the minor's age. In this vein, the minor's appearance,
the minor's representations, and apparently official identification records
(e.g., a birth certificate, driver's license, or draft card) would all be
relevant factors.

__________

§712-1216 Commentary:

1. Kuh, Foolish Figleaves? 264-65 (1967) (emphasis added).

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §712-1216

Act 35, Session Laws 2015, amended subsection (1) by deleting
the reference to §712-1214.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Lum Court and the First Amendment. 14 UH L. Rev. 395
(1992).

Case Notes

Subsection (1) held unconstitutional. 63 H. 596, 634 P.2d 80
(1981).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next